src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_9VILLW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_9VILLW/XX_PL ;


LEXICON N_10HWRAK !!= @CODE@ hõrak:hõrak
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 hõrak 
!!€  hõrak: hõrak+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  hõraga: hõrak+N+Sg+Gen
!!€  hõrakat: hõrak+N+Sg+Par
!!€  hõrakahe: hõrak+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  hõrakan: hõrak+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  hõrakast: hõrak+N+Sg+Ela
!!€  hõrakalõ: hõrak+N+Sg+All
!!€  hõrakal: hõrak+N+Sg+Ade
!!€  hõrakalt: hõrak+N+Sg+Abl
!!€  hõrakas: hõrak+N+Sg+Tra
!!€  hõrakaniq: hõrak+N+Sg+Ter
!!€  hõrakaldaq: hõrak+N+Sg+Abe
!!€  hõragagaq: hõrak+N+Sg+Com
!!€  hõragaq: hõrak+N+Pl+Nom
!!€  hõrakidõ: hõrak+N+Pl+Gen
!!€  hõrakit: hõrak+N+Pl+Par
!!€  hõrakihe: hõrak+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  hõrakin: hõrak+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  hõrakist: hõrak+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  hõrakilõ: hõrak+N+Pl+All
!!€  hõrakil: hõrak+N+Pl+Ade
!!€  hõrakilt: hõrak+N+Pl+Abl
!!€  hõrakis: hõrak+N+Pl+Tra
!!€  hõrakiniq: hõrak+N+Pl+Ter
!!€  hõrakildaq: hõrak+N+Pl+Abe
!!€  hõrakidõgaq: hõrak+N+Pl+Com
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10HWRAK-SG ;
        N_10HWRAK_PL ;
LEXICON N_10HWRAK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10HWRAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HWRAK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10HWRAK_PL ;

LEXICON N_10HAIDAK !!= @CODE@ haidak:haidak
:%^G3 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10HAIDAK-SG ;
        N_10HAIDAK_PL ;
LEXICON N_10HAIDAK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HAIDAK_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK_PL ;

LEXICON N_10ESAEK !!= @CODE@ esäk:esäk
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10ESAEK-SG ;
        N_10ESAEK_PL ;
LEXICON N_10ESAEK-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10ESAEK_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10HAIDAK/ESAEK_PL ;

LEXICON N_10RAAMAT !!= @CODE@ raamat:raamat
:%^G3 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10RAAMAT-SG ;
        N_10RAAMAT_PL ;
LEXICON N_10RAAMAT-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-SG ;
LEXICON N_10RAAMAT_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT_PL ;

LEXICON N_10LEMBIT !!= @CODE@ esäk:esäk
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10LEMBIT-SG ;
        N_10LEMBIT_PL ;
LEXICON N_10LEMBIT-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT-SG ;
LEXICON N_10LEMBIT_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10RAAMAT/LEMBIT_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10VIDRIK !!= @CODE@ vidrik:vidrik
!!! gradation: no
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_10VIDRIK-SG ;
!        N_10VIDRIK_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10VIDRIK-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_10VIDRIK-SG ;
!LEXICON N_10VIDRIK_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_10VIDRIK_PL ;

LEXICON N_10AABITS !!= @CODE@ aabits:aabits
:%^G3 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10AABITS-SG ;
        N_10AABITS_PL ;
LEXICON N_10AABITS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AABITS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS_PL ;

LEXICON N_10HEERITS !!= @CODE@ heerits:heerits
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10HEERITS-SG ;
        N_10HEERITS_PL ;
LEXICON N_10HEERITS-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HEERITS_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10AABITS/HEERITS_PL ;

LEXICON N_10AADRWS1 !!= @CODE@ aadrõś:aadrõs
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10AADRWS1-SG ;
        N_10AADRWS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_10AADRWS1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRWS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AADRWS1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10AADRWS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_10AMMAT1 !!= @CODE@ ammat́:ammat
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10AMMAT1-SG ;
        N_10AMMAT1_PL ;
LEXICON N_10AMMAT1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_10AMMAT1-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AMMAT1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_10AMMAT1_PL ;

LEXICON N_10HUEPAETS1 !!= @CODE@ hüpätś:hüpä%{td%}s
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_10HUEPAETS1-SG ;
 N_10HUEPAETS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_10HUEPAETS1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_10HUEPAETS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HUEPAETS1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_10HUEPAETS1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10HERESK1 !!= @CODE@ heresḱ:heresḱ
!:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_10HERESK1-SG ;
!        N_10HERESK1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10HERESK1-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESK1-SG ;
!LEXICON N_10HERESK1_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_10HERESK1_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10KADSAK !!= @CODE@ kadsak:kadsak
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_10KADSAK-SG ;
!        N_10KADSAK_PL ;

!LEXICON N_10KADSAK-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_10KADSAK-SG ;
!LEXICON N_10KADSAK_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_10KADSAK_PL ;



LEXICON N_11LAETEQ !!= @CODE@ läteq:lä%{tØ%}te
:%^Pen%^G1%>q ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-q:%^Pen%^G1 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_11LAETEQ-SG ;
 N_11LAETEQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_11LAETEQ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11LAETEQ_PL
:%{front%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ_PL ;

LEXICON N_11ANNWQ !!= @CODE@ annõq:andõ
:%^Pen%^G1%>q ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-q:%^Pen%^G1 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_11ANNWQ-SG ;
 N_11ANNWQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_11ANNWQ-SG
:%{back%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11ANNWQ_PL
:%{back%} NMN_11ANNWQ/LAETEQ_PL ;

LEXICON N_11AINWQ !!= @CODE@ ainõq:ainõ
:%>q ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-q: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_11AINWQ-SG ;
 N_11AINWQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_11AINWQ-SG
:%{back%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11AINWQ_PL
:%{back%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_11KELMEQ !!= @CODE@ kelmeq:ainõ
:%>q ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-q: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_11KELMEQ-SG ;
 N_11KELMEQ_PL ;
LEXICON N_11KELMEQ-SG
:%{front%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11KELMEQ_PL
:%{front%} NMN_11AINWQ/KELMEQ_PL ;

LEXICON N_11VAIH !!= @CODE@ vaih:vaih
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_11VAIH-SG ;
 N_11VAIH_PL ;
LEXICON N_11VAIH-SG
:%{back%} NMN_11VAIH/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_11VAIH_PL
:%{back%} NMN_11VAIH/XX_PL ;

LEXICON N_12REPAEN1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_12REPAEN1-SG ;
 N_12REPAEN1_PL ;
LEXICON N_12REPAEN1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_12HOPWN1/REPAEN1-SG ;
LEXICON N_12REPAEN1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_12HOPWN1/REPAEN1_PL ;

LEXICON N_12HOPWN1
:n%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:n%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_12HOPWN1-SG ;
 N_12HOPWN1_PL ;
LEXICON N_12HOPWN1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_12HOPWN1/REPAEN1-SG ;
LEXICON N_12HOPWN1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_12HOPWN1/REPAEN1_PL ;

LEXICON N_12SUEKUES
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_12SUEKUES-SG ;
 N_12SUEKUES_PL ;
LEXICON N_12SUEKUES-SG
:%{front%} NMN_12SUEKUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_12SUEKUES_PL
:%{front%} NMN_12SUEKUES_PL ;

LEXICON N_12NWKWS1  !!= @CODE@ nõkõś:nõ%{kg%}õ%{sś%}
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_12NWKWS1-SG ;
 N_12NWKWS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_12NWKWS1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_12NWKWS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_12NWKWS1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_12NWKWS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_13ALONW !!= @CODE@ alonõ:alo
! Gradation: No
:nõ ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_13ALONW-SG ;
 N_13ALONW_PL ;
LEXICON N_13ALONW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_13ALONW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE_PL ;

LEXICON N_13TAEHINE !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
! Gradation: No
:ne ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_13TAEHINE-SG ;
 N_13TAEHINE_PL ;
LEXICON N_13TAEHINE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_13TAEHINE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_13ALONW/TAEHINE_PL ;

!LEXICON N_13SAEAENE !!= @CODE@ sääne:tähi
!! Gradation: No
!!:ne ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
! N_13SAEAENE-SG ;
! N_13SAEAENE_PL ;

!LEXICON N_13SAEAENE-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_13XX/SAEAENE-SG ;
!LEXICON N_13SAEAENE_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_13XX/SAEAENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_14RITS1KAS !!= @CODE@ ritśkas:ritśka%{sØ%}
! Gradation: No
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_14RITS1KAS-SG ;
        N_14RITS1KAS_PL ;
LEXICON N_14RITS1KAS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH-SG ;
LEXICON N_14RITS1KAS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH_PL ;

!LEXICON N_14HERNEH !!= @CODE@ herneh:herne%{hØ%}
!! Gradation: No
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_14HERNEH-SG ;
!        N_14HERNEH_PL ;

!LEXICON N_14HERNEH-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH-SG ;
!LEXICON N_14HERNEH_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_14RITS1KAS/HERNEH_PL ;
