src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
tsagõhõq+N:tsa%{kg%}õ N_9VILLW_PL "_#idõ, #it__tsagõh|õq_" ;
aadrõś+N:aadrõ%{sś%} N_10AADRWS1 "_#i, #sit__aadrõś_" ;
johvik+N:johvi%{kg%} N_10HWRAK "_#ga #gu, #kat #kut__johvi|k_" ;
kamak+N:kama%{kg%} N_10HWRAK "_#gu #ga, #kut #kat__kama|k_" ;
kosmak+N:kosma%{kg%} N_10HAIDAK "_#gu, #kut__kosma|k_" ;
kroomits+N:kroomi%{td%}s N_10AABITS "_#dsa, #tsat__kroomi|ts_" ;
kukatś+N:kuka%{td%}%{sś%} N_10AMMAT1 "_#dsi, #tsit__kuka|tś_" ;
kändsäk+N:kändsä%{kg%} N_10ESAEK "_#gu, #kut__kändsä|k_" ;
kügrätś+N:kügrä%{td%}%{sś%} N_10HUEPAETS1 "_#dsi, #tsit__kügrä|tś_" ;
küüvits+N:küüvi%{td%}s N_10HEERITS "_#dsä, #tsät__küüvi|ts_" ;
manits+N:mani%{td%}s N_10AABITS "_#dsa, #tsat__mani|ts_" ;
medik+N:medi%{kg%} N_10ESAEK "_#gu, #kut__medi|k_" ;
mesikürvits+N:mesikürvi%{td%}s N_10HEERITS "_#dsä, #tsät__mesikürvi|ts_" ;
opiraamat+N:opiraama%{td%} N_10HAIDAK "_#du, #tut__opiraama|t_" ;
paprik+N:papri%{kg%} N_10HWRAK "_#ga #gu, #kat #kut__papri|k_" ;
pilet́+N:pile%{td%} N_10AMMAT1 "_#di, #tit__pile|t́_" ;
plövvätś+N:plövvä%{td%}%{sś%} N_10HUEPAETS1 "_#dsi, #tsit__plövvä|tś_" ;
rambits+N:rambi%{td%}s N_10AABITS "_#dsa, #tsat__rambi|ts_" ;
rätsäk+N:rätsä%{kg%} N_10ESAEK "_#gu, #kut__rätsä|k_" ;
tikatiirits+N:tikatiiri%{td%}s N_10HEERITS "_#dsä, #tsät__tikatiiri|ts_" ;
tirak+N:tira%{kg%} N_10HAIDAK "_#gu, #kut__tira|k_" ;
tümbätś+N:tümbä%{td%}%{sś%} N_10HUEPAETS1 "_#dsi, #tsit__tümbä|tś_" ;
virgatś+N:virga%{td%}%{sś%} N_10AMMAT1 "_#dsi, #tsit__virga|tś_" ;
aivõq+N:%{ˋØ%}#aivõ N_11AINWQ_PL "_ˋaividõ, %{ˋØ%}aivit__ˋaivõq_" ;
imeq+N:i%{mØ%}me N_11LAETEQ "_ˋimme, imet__imeq_" ;
kaidsõq+N:kai%{td%}sõ N_11ANNWQ "_ˋkaitsõ, kaidsõt__kaidsõq_" ;
kalmõq+N:kalmõ N_11AINWQ "_ˋkalmõ, kalmõt__kalmõq_" ;
kuhtsõq+N:%{ˋØ%}#kuh%{td%}sõ N_11AINWQ_PL "_#idõ, #it__ˋkuhts|õq_" ;
laulõq+N:laulõ N_11AINWQ "_ˋlaulõ, laulõt __laulõq_" ;
leedeq+N:l%{ei%}%{ei%}%{td%}e N_11LAETEQ "_li̬i̬te, leedet__leedeq_" ;
lihavõtõq+N:lihavõ%{tØ%}tõ N_11ANNWQ "_#tõ, #õt__lihavõt|õq_" ;
nesseq+N:nesse N_11KELMEQ "_ˋnesse, nesset__nesseq_" ;
palgõq+N:%{ˋØ%}#pal%{kg%}õ N_11ANNWQ_PL "_#idõ, #it__ˋpalg|õq_" ;
pirrupehteq+N:pirru%{ˋØ%}peh%{tØ%}e N_11KELMEQ "_#%{ˋØ%}pehtide, #%{ˋØ%}pehtit__pirru%{ˋØ%}pehteq_" ;
päidseq+N:%{ˋØ%}#päi%{td%}se N_11LAETEQ_PL "_#tside, #tsit__ˋpäi|dseq_" ;
rehkeq+N:%{ˋØ%}#reh%{kØ%}e N_11KELMEQ_PL "_#ide, #it__ˋrehk|eq_" ;
rõibõq+N:rõi%{pb%}õ N_11ANNWQ "_ˋrõipõ, rõibõt__rõibõq_" ;
räämeq+N:%{ˋØ%}#rääme N_11KELMEQ_PL "_#ide, #it__ˋrääm|eq_" ;
räüseq+N:räü%{sØ%}se N_11LAETEQ "_ˋräüsse, räüset__räüseq_" ;
undsõq+N:undsõ N_11AINWQ "_ˋundsõ, undsõt__undsõq_" ;
vaih+N:vaih N_11VAIH "_ˋvaihõ %{ˋØ%}vahjõ, vahet vaiht__vaheq_" ;
virovärteq+N:viro%{ˋØ%}vär%{td%}e N_11KELMEQ_PL "_#ide, #it__viro%{ˋØ%}värt|eq_" ;
väimeq+N:väime N_11KELMEQ "_ˋväime, väimet__väimeq_" ;
juudahopõń+N:%{ˋØ%}#juudaho%{pb%}õ N_12HOPWN1 "_#bõsõ, #bõst__ˋjuudaho|põń_" ;
maahopõń+N:maaho%{pb%}õ N_12HOPWN1 "_#bõsõ, #bõst__maaho|põń_" ;
repäń+N:re%{pb%}ä N_12REPAEN1 "_#bäse, #bäst__re|päń_" ;
tundihopõń+N:tundiho%{pb%}õ N_12HOPWN1 "_#bõsõ, #bõst__tundiho|põń_" ;
nukuś+N:nu%{kg%}u%{sś%} N_12NWKWS1 "_#gus(s)õ, #gust__nu|kuś_" ;
nõkõś+N:nõ%{kg%}õ%{sś%} N_12NWKWS1 "_#gõs(s)õ, #gõst__nõ|kõś_" ;
raudnõkõś+N:raudnõ%{kg%}õ%{sś%} N_12NWKWS1 "_#gõs(s)õ, #gõst__raudnõ|kõś_" ;
süküs+N:sü%{kg%}üs N_12SUEKUES "_#güse, #küst__sü|küs_One of a kind" ;
kihäline+N:kihäli N_13TAEHINE ;
eelektriline+N:eelektrili N_13TAEHINE ;
kaardaalonõ+N:%{ˋØ%}#kaardaalo N_13ALONW "_#dsõ, #st__ˋkaardaalo|nõ_" ;
kurõpääline+N:kurõpääli N_13TAEHINE "_#dse, #st__kurõpääli|ne_" ;
lokialonõ+N:lokialo N_13ALONW "_#dsõ, #st__lokialo|nõ_" ;
rabakalodsõq+N:rabakalo N_13ALONW_PL "_#tsidõ, #tsit__rabakalo|dsõq_" ;
ristjädseq+N:%{ˋØ%}#ristjä N_13TAEHINE_PL "_#tside, #tsiid__ˋristjä|dseq_" ;
suidsõq+N:%{ˋØ%}#sui N_13ALONW_PL "_#tsidõ, #tsit__ˋsui|dsõq_" ;
veeridseq+N:veeri N_13TAEHINE_PL "_#tside, #tsit __veeri|dseq_" ;
viiŕpoolinõ+N:vi̬i̬ŕpooli N_13ALONW "_#dsõ, #st__vi̬i̬ŕpooli|nõ_" ;
naaris+N:naari%{sØ%} N_14RITS1KAS "_ˋnaari, naarist __naaris_" ;
saarvas+N:saarva%{sØ%} N_14RITS1KAS "_ˋsaarva, saarvast__saarvas_" ;
